Hawaii statutes.
[§378-29.3] Penalties. (a) Civil.
Any employer found in violation of this part shall be subject to a fine of not
less than $100 nor more than $1,000 to be collected by the director and such
fine shall not be suspended. Each violation shall constitute a separate
offense. Amounts so collected by the director shall be paid into the general
fund.

(b) Criminal. Whoever intentionally resists,
prevents, impedes, or interferes with the department or any of its agents or
representatives in the performance of duties pursuant to this part, or who in
any manner intentionally violates the law, shall be fined not more than $1,000,
or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

(c) All criminal actions for violations of
this part or any rule issued pursuant thereto, shall be prosecuted by the
attorney general or public prosecutor. [L 1985, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next